Utah statutes.
7-9-55.    Nonexempt credit unions.
(1) (a)  A credit union organized under this chapter is a nonexempt credit
union under this section on the day on which:
(i)  on or after May 5, 2003 the credit union has a field of membership as
evidenced by the bylaws of the credit union that includes all residents of two
or more counties; and
(ii)  at least two of the counties described in Subsection (1)(a)(i) are
counties of the first or second class as classified by Section 17-50-501.
(b)  For purposes of Subsection (1)(a) only:
(i)  residents of a county that are added to the field of membership of a
credit union as a result of a supervisory action under Chapter 2 or 19 are not
considered to be within the field of membership of that credit union; and
(ii)  residents of a city of the third, fourth, or fifth class or a town that
are added to the field of membership of a credit union in accordance with
Section 7-9-52 are not considered to be within the field of membership of that
credit union unless all residents of the county in which that city or town are
located are included in the field of membership of the credit union.
(2)  If a credit union becomes a nonexempt credit union under this section,
the nonexempt credit union is a nonexempt credit union:
(a)  for as long as the nonexempt credit union is organized under this
chapter; and
(b)  notwithstanding whether after the day on which the nonexempt credit union
becomes a nonexempt credit union the nonexempt credit union meets the
requirements of Subsection (1)(a).
(3)  Regardless of whether or not a credit union has located branches in two
or more counties in this state, a credit union organized under this chapter
does not become a nonexempt credit union if the field of membership of the
credit union as evidenced by the bylaws of the credit union does not meet the
requirements of Subsection (1).
